Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.054

Credit policies for AP, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international exams—Reports.

(1) The institutions of higher education must establish a coordinated, evidence-based policy for granting as many undergraduate college credits, as possible and appropriate, to students who have earned minimum scores of three on advanced placement exams, four on standard-level and higher-level international baccalaureate exams, or scores of E(e) or higher on A and AS level Cambridge international exams.

(2) Each institution of higher education must create a process for retroactively awarding international baccalaureate exam undergraduate college credits under the terms of this section to students who first enrolled in the institution of higher education in the 2018-19 academic year.

(3) Credit policies regarding all advanced placement and international baccalaureate exams must be posted on campus websites effective for the 2019 fall academic term. Credit policies regarding all Cambridge international exams must be posted on campus websites effective for the 2020 fall academic term. If an institution of higher education is unable to award a general education course equivalency, the student may request in writing an evidence-based reason as to why general education course equivalency cannot be granted. Institutions of higher education must maintain websites regarding their advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international policies in a publicly accessible way. The institutions of higher education must conduct biennial reviews of their advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international credit policies and report noncompliance to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1st each biennium beginning November 1, 2019.

(4) The institutions of higher education must provide an update to the joint legislative audit and review committee on their credit awarding policies by December 31, 2019.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "general education course equivalency" means credit that fulfills general education or major requirements and is not awarded as elective credit.

[ 2019 c 316 s 2; 2017 c 179 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 316: "The legislature finds that advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international coursework prepares students for postsecondary success and provides opportunities for them to earn college credit or secure placement in advanced courses.

The legislature feels strongly that students who have earned minimum scores of three on advanced placement exams, four on standard-level and higher-level international baccalaureate exams, or scores of E(e) or higher on A and AS level Cambridge international exams deserve to receive undergraduate college credit, including elective credit and, where appropriate, course equivalent credit, for their work.

The legislature finds it necessary to develop a systemwide credit policy that allows those students to easily understand in advance whether institutions of higher education will award them credit, as well as which type of credit students will receive and the rationale for the institution of higher education's determination.

The legislature further encourages institutions of higher education to establish a policy favoring the award of course equivalent credit for the successful completion of standardized and commonly required courses." [ 2019 c 316 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2017 c 179: "The legislature finds that advanced placement coursework prepares students for postsecondary success and provides opportunities for them to earn college credit or secure placement in advanced courses. The legislature further finds that eighty-four thousand eight hundred sixty-six students took an AP exam in Washington state in 2015. The legislature further finds that six thousand six hundred sixty-seven of those students were underrepresented minority students and nine thousand four hundred seventy-one were low-income students. The legislature further finds that of the students that took an AP exam in Washington state in 2015, fifty-one thousand seven hundred twenty-five scored a three, four, or five.

Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a policy for granting as many undergraduate course credits as possible to students who have earned a minimum score of three on their AP exams and clearly communicate credit awarding policies and course equivalencies to students. The goal of the policy is to award course credit in all appropriate instances and maximize the number of college students given college credit for AP exam scores of three or higher." [ 2017 c 179 s 1.]